Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1746YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 361 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. Subtract, to the extent included, 3 the amount of cash tips that were received and are included 4 on statements furnished to an employer as required by section 5 6053(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. 6 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 7 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 8